Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.210

Violations—Assurance of discontinuance—Effect.

The attorney general may accept an assurance of discontinuance of any act or practice deemed in violation of this chapter in the enforcement thereof from any person engaging in or who has engaged in such act or practice. Any such assurance shall be in writing and be filed with and subject to the approval of the superior court of the county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in the alternative, in Thurston county. Failure to perform the terms of any such assurance shall constitute prima facie proof of a violation of this chapter for the purpose of securing any injunction as provided for in RCW 18.28.200: PROVIDED, That after commencement of any action by a prosecuting attorney, as provided therein, the attorney general may not accept an assurance of discontinuance without the consent of said prosecuting attorney.

[ 2011 c 336 s 476; 1967 c 201 s 21.]